Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202279-1128
Use of funds; failure to offer acceptable program; effect.

Any program receiving funds under the Special Education Act shall not use such funds to match state funds under the provisions of other programs. The members of the school board of any school district not offering continuous special education programs acceptable to the State Board of Education shall be in violation of the law. No state funds shall be paid to any school district as long as such violation exists, but no deduction shall be made from any funds required by the Constitution of Nebraska to be paid to such district.

Laws 1973, LB 403, § 2;

Laws 1974, LB 863, § 5;

Laws 1976, LB 761, § 5;

Laws 1977, LB 443, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1984), § 43-642;

Laws 1987, LB 367, § 21;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-3321;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 810;

Laws 1997, LB 346, § 18;

Laws 1999, LB 813, § 39;

Laws 2013, LB23, § 47;

Laws 2019, LB675, § 24.